Missouri, session 2026, HB2237.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 590.502 and 590.653, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 590.502 and 590.653, to read as follows:
590.502. 1. For purposes of this section, the following shall mean:
(1) "Administering authority", any individual or body authorized by a law
enforcement agency to hear and make final decisions regarding appeals of disciplinary
actions issued by such agency;
(2) "Color of law", any act by a law enforcement officer, whether on duty or off duty,
that is performed in furtherance of his or her sworn duty to enforce laws and to protect and
serve the public;
(3) "Economic loss", any economic loss including, but not limited to, loss of overtime
accrual, overtime income, sick time accrual, sick time, secondary employment income,
holiday pay, and vacation pay;
(4) "Good cause", sufficient evidence or facts that would support a party's request for
extensions of time or any other requests seeking accommodations outside the scope of the
rules set out herein;
(5) "Law enforcement officer", any commissioned peace officer with the power to
arrest for a violation of the criminal code who is employed by any unit of the state or any
county, charter county, city, charter city, municipality, district, college, university, or any other
political subdivision or is employed by the board of police commissioners as defined in
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2237 2
chapter 84. Law enforcement officer shall not include any officer who is the highest ranking
officer in the law enforcement agency.
2. Whenever a law enforcement officer is under administrative investigation or is
subjected to administrative questioning that the officer reasonably believes could lead to
disciplinary action, demotion, dismissal, transfer, or placement on a status that could lead to
economic loss, the investigation or questioning shall be conducted under the following
conditions:
(1) The law enforcement officer who is the subject of the investigation shall be
informed, in writing, of the existence and nature of the alleged violation and the individuals
who will be conducting the investigation. Notice shall be provided to the officer along with a
copy of the complaint at least twenty-four hours prior to any interrogation or interview of the
officer;
(2) Any person, including members of the same agency or department as the officer
under investigation, filing a complaint against a law enforcement officer shall have the
complaint supported by a written statement outlining the complaint that includes the personal
identifying information of the person filing the complaint. All personal identifying
information shall be held confidential by the investigating agency;
(3) When a law enforcement officer is questioned or interviewed regarding matters
pertaining to his or her law enforcement duties or actions taken within the scope of his or her
employment, such questioning shall be conducted for a reasonable length of time and only
while the officer is on duty unless reasonable circumstances exist that necessitate questioning
the officer while he or she is off duty;
(4) Any interviews or questioning shall be conducted at a secure location at the
agency that is conducting the investigation or at the place where the officer reports to work,
unless the officer consents to another location;
(5) Law enforcement officers shall be questioned by up to two investigators and shall
be informed of the name, rank, and command of the investigator or investigators conducting
the investigation; except that, separate investigators shall be assigned to investigate alleged
department policy violations and alleged criminal violations;
(6) Interview sessions shall be for a reasonable period of time. There shall be times
provided for the officer to allow for such personal necessities and rest periods as are
reasonably necessary;
(7) Prior to an interview session, the investigator or investigators conducting the
investigation shall advise the law enforcement officer of the rule set out in Garrity v. New
Jersey, 385 U.S. 493 (1967), specifically that the law enforcement officer is being ordered to
answer questions under threat of disciplinary action and that the officer's answers to the
questions will not be used against the officer in criminal proceedings;

HB 2237 3
(8) Law enforcement officers shall not be threatened, harassed, or promised rewards
to induce them into answering any question; except that, law enforcement officers may be
compelled by their employer to give protected Garrity statements to an investigator under the
direct control of the employer, but such compelled statements shall not be used or derivatively
used against the officer in any aspect of a criminal case brought against the officer;
(9) Law enforcement officers under investigation are entitled to have an attorney or
any duly authorized representative present during any questioning that the law enforcement
officer reasonably believes may result in disciplinary action. The attorney or representative
shall be permitted to confer with the officer but shall not unduly disrupt or interfere with the
interview. The questioning shall be suspended for a period of up to twenty-four hours if the
officer requests representation;
(10) Prior to the law enforcement officer being interviewed, the officer and his or her
attorney or representative shall have the opportunity to review the complaint;
(11) The law enforcement agency conducting the investigation shall have ninety days
from receipt of a citizen complaint to complete such investigation. The agency shall
determine the disposition of the complaint and render a disciplinary decision, if any, within
ninety days. The agency may, for good cause, petition the administering authority overseeing
the administration of discipline for an extension of time to complete the investigation. If the
administering authority finds the agency has shown good cause for the granting of an
extension of time to complete the investigation, the administering authority shall grant an
extension of up to sixty days. The agency is limited to two extensions per investigation;
except that, if there is an ongoing criminal investigation there shall be no limitation on the
amount of sixty-day extensions. For good cause shown, the internal investigation may be
tolled until the conclusion of a concurrent criminal investigation arising out of the same
alleged conduct. Absent consent from the officer being investigated, the administering
authority overseeing the administration of discipline shall set the matter for hearing and shall
provide notice of the hearing to the law enforcement officer under investigation. The officer
shall have the right to attend the hearing and to present evidence and arguments against
extension;
(12) Within five days of the conclusion of the administrative investigation, the
investigator shall inform the officer, in writing, of the investigative findings and any
recommendation for further action, including discipline;
(13) A complete record of the administrative investigation shall be kept by the law
enforcement agency conducting such investigation. Upon completion of the investigation, a
copy of the entire record, including, but not limited to, audio, video, and transcribed
statements, shall be provided to the officer or the officer's representative within five business

HB 2237 4
days of the officer's written request. The agency may request a protective order to redact all
personal identifying witness information; and
(14) All records compiled as a result of any investigation subject to the provisions of
this section shall be held confidential and shall not be subject to disclosure under chapter 610,
except by lawful subpoena or court order, by release approved by the officer, or as provided in
section 590.070.
3. Law enforcement officers who are suspended without pay, demoted, terminated,
transferred, or placed on a status resulting in economic loss shall be entitled to a full due
process hearing. However, nothing in this section shall prohibit a law enforcement agency
100 and the authorized bargaining representative for a law enforcement officer employed by that
101 agency from reaching written agreements providing disciplinary procedures more favorable
102 than those provided for this section. The components of the hearing shall include, at a
103 minimum:
104 (1) The right to be represented by an attorney or other individual of their choice
105 during the hearing;
106 (2) Seven days' notice of the hearing date and time;
107 (3) An opportunity to access and review documents, at least seven days in advance of
108 the hearing, that are in the employer's possession and that were used as a basis for the
109 disciplinary action;
110 (4) The right to refuse to testify at the hearing if the officer is concurrently facing
111 criminal charges in connection with the same incident. A law enforcement officer's decision
112 not to testify shall not result in additional internal charges or discipline;
113 (5) A complete record of the hearing shall be kept by the agency for purposes of
114 appeal. The record shall be provided to the officer or his or her attorney upon written request;
115 (6) The entire record of the hearing shall remain confidential and shall not be subject
116 to disclosure under chapter 610, except by lawful subpoena or court order.
117 4. Any decision, order, or action taken following the hearing shall be in writing and
118 shall be accompanied by findings of fact. The findings shall consist of a concise statement
119 upon each issue in the case. A copy of the decision or order accompanying findings and
120 conclusions along with the written action and right of appeal, if any, shall be delivered or
121 mailed promptly to the law enforcement officer or to the officer's attorney or representative of
122 record.
123 5. Law enforcement officers shall have the opportunity to provide a written response
124 to any adverse materials placed in their personnel file, and such written response shall be
125 permanently attached to the adverse material.
126 6. Law enforcement officers shall have the right to compensation for any economic
127 loss incurred during an investigation if the officer is found to have committed no misconduct.

HB 2237 5
128 7. Employers shall defend and indemnify law enforcement officers from and against
129 civil claims made against them in their official and individual capacities if the alleged conduct
130 arose in the course and scope of their obligations and duties as law enforcement officers. This
131 includes any actions taken off duty if such actions were taken under color of law. In the event
132 the law enforcement officer is convicted of, or pleads guilty to, criminal charges arising out of
133 the same conduct, the employer shall no longer be obligated to defend and indemnify the
134 officer in connection with related civil claims.
135 8. Law enforcement officers shall not be disciplined, demoted, dismissed, transferred,
136 or placed on a status resulting in economic loss as a result of the assertion of their
137 constitutional rights in any judicial proceeding, unless the officer admits to wrongdoing, in
138 which case the provisions of this section shall not apply.
139 9. Any aggrieved law enforcement officer or authorized representative may seek
140 judicial enforcement of the requirements of this section. Suits to enforce this section shall be
141 brought in the circuit court for the county in which the law enforcement agency or
142 governmental body has its principal place of business.
143 10. Upon a finding by a preponderance of the evidence that a law enforcement
144 agency, governmental body, or member of same has violated any provision of this section, a
145 court shall void any action taken in violation of this section. The court may also award the
146 law enforcement officer the costs of bringing the suit including, but not limited to, attorneys'
147 fees. A lawsuit for enforcement shall be brought within one year from which the violation is
148 ascertainable.
149 11. Nothing in this section shall apply to any investigation or other action by the
150 director regarding a license issued by the director under this chapter.
151 12. A law enforcement agency that has substantially similar or greater procedures
152 shall be deemed in compliance with this section.
153 13. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, civilian oversight agencies
154 operating pursuant to local ordinances shall not be deemed in violation of law
155 enforcement officers' due process rights under this section when the law enforcement
156 officers are afforded notice, representation, and the opportunity to respond to findings
157 prior to any disciplinary action.
590.653. 1. Each city, county, and city not within a county may establish a civilian
review board, division of civilian oversight, or any other entity which provides civilian
review or oversight of police agencies, or may use an existing civilian review board or
division of civilian oversight or other named entity which has been appointed by the local
governing body, with the authority to investigate allegations of misconduct by local law
enforcement officers towards members of the public. The members shall not receive

HB 2237 6
compensation but shall receive reimbursement from the local governing body for all
reasonable and necessary expenses.
2. The board, division, or any other such entity, shall have the power [solely limited]
to [receiving, investigating, making findings and recommending] receive, investigate, and
make findings and recommendations for disciplinary action upon complaints by members
of the public against members of the police department that allege misconduct involving
excessive use of force, abuse of authority, discourtesy, or use of offensive language,
including, but not limited to, slurs relating to race, ethnicity, religion, gender, sexual
orientation,and disability. The findings and recommendations of the board, division, or other
entity and the basis therefor, shall be submitted to the chief law enforcement official. No
finding or recommendation shall be based solely upon an unsworn complaint or statement,
nor shall prior unsubstantiated, unfounded,or withdrawn complaints be the basis for any such
findings or recommendations. [Only the powers specifically granted herein are authorized
and any and all authority granted to future or existing boards, divisions, or entities outside the
scope of the powers listed herein are expressly preempted and void as a matter of law.]
3. In addition to the powers granted in subsection 2 of this section, the board,
division, or any other such entity shall have the authority to:
(1) Subpoena witness testimony and documents as provided under section
536.077;
(2) Access unredacted internal affairs files upon request;
(3) Access body camera footage upon request;
(4) Issue public reports summarizing findings, recommendations, and
disciplinary outcomes; and
(5) Refer evidence of criminal conduct to the appropriate prosecuting authority.
4. Law enforcement officers, city or county employees, or members of the public
who provide information or testimony to a board, division, or other such entity shall be
protected from retaliation, demotion, suspension, or discharge. Any actions arising
from such conduct shall proceed as provided under section 105.055.
5. (1) Each board, division, or other such entity shall annually publish a report,
no later than January first of each year, containing:
(a) The number of complaints received and investigated by the board, division,
or other such entity;
(b) The racial and gender information of the law enforcement officers involved
and of the complainant;
(c) The findings of the board, division, or other such entity, which shall be
organized by type and disposition;
(d) Disciplinary outcomes and trends;

HB 2237 7
(e) The number of cases in which recommendations of the board, division, or
other such entity were overturned; and
(f) Policy recommendations issued by the board, division, or other such entity to
the chief law enforcement official of the municipality or county.
(2) The annual report of the board, division, or other such entity shall be made
public on the board, division, or other entity's website and be submitted to the local
governing body and to the department of public safety.
(3) Any public report issued by the board, division, or other such entity shall be
subject to disclosure under chapter 610.
(4) If a chief of police of a municipality or county disagrees with the findings of a
board, division, or other such entity, the chief of police shall submit his or her objections
in writing to such board, division, or entity.
6. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any city operating
under a home-rule charter shall retain full authority to define the structure and
jurisdiction over a board, division, or other such entity.
✔